Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB369.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 95.495 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 337.285, in cities listed on the registry pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or
urban-county governments, except those in which, by ordinance, the patrolmen are employed or paid by the
day, the members of the police department shall not be required to work more than eight (8) hours per day, for
five (5) days each week or ten (10) hours per day, for four (4) days each week, except in the event of an
emergency. Each member of the police department shall be permitted to accrue[have] an annual leave of
fifteen (15) working days with full pay each year, as specifically established in the personnel policy
applicable to members of the department. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a member of the police
department from voluntarily agreeing to work a different work schedule provided that the officer is paid
overtime for any work performed in excess of forty (40) hours per week.
(2) The salary of the members of the police department shall not be reduced by reason of the enactment of this
section.
(3) On or before January 1, 2015, the Department for Local Government shall create a registry of cities that shall
comply with the provisions of this section. The Department for Local Government shall include each of those
cities on the registry that were classified as cities of the second or third class on August 1, 2014. The
Department for Local Government shall make the information included on the registry available to the public
by publishing it on its website[Web site].
Signed by Governor March 31, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version